Washington statutes.
RCW 43.103.020

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Council" means the Washington state forensic investigations council.

(2) "Crime laboratory" means the Washington state patrol crime laboratory system created in RCW 43.43.670 and under the bureau of forensic laboratory services of the Washington state patrol.

(3) "State toxicology laboratory" means the Washington state toxicology laboratory and under the bureau of forensic laboratory services of the Washington state patrol.

[ 1999 c 40 s 3; 1995 c 398 s 3; 1983 1st ex.s. c 16 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 40: See note following RCW 43.103.010.